Utah statutes.
4-31-14.   Restrictions on movement of infected or exposed domestic animals.
A person who owns or has possession of a domestic animal or domesticated elk
and knows that it is infected with, or has been exposed to, any contagious or
infectious disease may not:
(1)  permit it to run at large, or come in contact with another domestic
animal which can be infected; or
(2)  sell, ship, trade, or give away an infected animal or domesticated elk
without disclosing that it is diseased or has been exposed to disease.
